Utah statutes.
76-7-203.   Sale of child -- Felony -- Payment of adoption related expenses.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "Adoption related expenses" means expenses that:
(i)  are reasonably related to the adoption of a child;
(ii)  are incurred for a reasonable amount; and
(iii)  may include expenses:
(A)  of the mother or father of the child being adopted, including:
(I)  legal expenses;
(II)  maternity expenses;
(III)  medical expenses;
(IV)  hospital expenses;
(V)  counseling expenses;
(VI)  temporary living expenses during the pregnancy or confinement of the
mother; or
(VII)  expenses for travel between the mother's or father's home and the
location where the child will be born or placed for adoption;
(B)  of a directly affected person for:
(I)  travel between the directly affected person's home and the location where
the child will be born or placed for adoption; or
(II)  temporary living expenses during the pregnancy or confinement of the
mother; or
(C)  other than those included in Subsection (1)(a)(iii)(A) or (B), that are
not made for the purpose of inducing the mother, parent, or legal guardian of
a child to:
(I)  place the child for adoption;
(II)  consent to an adoption; or
(III)  cooperate in the completion of an adoption.
(b)  "Directly affected person" means a person who is:
(i)  a parent or guardian of a minor when the minor is the mother or father of
the child being adopted;
(ii)  a dependant of:
(A)  the mother or father of the child being adopted; or
(B)  the parent or guardian described in Subsection (1)(b)(i); or
(iii)  the spouse of the mother or father of the child being adopted.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a person is guilty of a third
degree felony if the person:
(a)  while having custody, care, control, or possession of a child, sells, or
disposes of the child, or attempts or offers to sell or dispose of the child,
for and in consideration of the payment of money or another thing of value; or
(b)  offers, gives, or attempts to give money or another thing of value to a
person, with the intent to induce or encourage a person to violate Subsection
(2)(a).
(3)  A person does not violate this section by paying or receiving payment for
adoption related expenses, if:
(a)  the expenses are paid as an act of charity; and
(b) the payment is not made for the purpose of inducing the mother, parent, or
legal guardian of a child to:
(i)  place the child for adoption;
(ii)  consent to an adoption; or
(iii)  cooperate in the completion of an adoption.
